Maryland, session 2026, HB0892.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Alkaline hydrolysis” means the process of reducing human remains using
water, alkaline chemicals, and heat inside a watertight vessel to accelerate decomposition.
(c) “Authorizing agent” has the meaning stated in § 5–508 of the Health – General
Article.
(d) (1) “Burial goods” means goods that are used in connection with burial.
(2) “Burial goods” includes:
(i) a casket;
(ii) a grave liner;
(iii) a memorial;
(iv) a monument;
(v) a scroll;
(vi) an urn;
(vii) a vase; and
(viii) a vault.
(e) “Burial goods business” means a business that provides burial goods.
(f) (1) “Cemetery” means land used or to be used for interment.

HOUSE BILL 892 3
(2) “Cemetery” includes:
(I) a structure used or to be used for interment; AND
(II) A STRUCTURE USED TO CONDUCT BUSINESS RELATED TO
THE OPERATION OF A CEMETERY.
(g) “Cremation” means the disposition of a dead human body by means of
incineration.
(h) “Crematory” means a building, portion of a building, or structure that houses
the necessary appliances and facilities for cremation or alkaline hydrolysis.
(I) “CULTURAL AFFILIATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 14–121 OF
THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE.
(J) “DESCENDANT COMMUNITY ORGANIZATION” MEANS AN ORGANIZATION
THAT HAS MEMBERS WHO HAVE ANCESTORS WHO ARE INTERRED AT A CEMETERY
OR WHO HAVE A CULTURAL AFFILIATION WITH THE DECEASED PERSONS INTERRED
AT A CEMETERY.
[(i)] (K) “Director” means the Director of the Office of Cemetery Oversight.
[(j)] (L) “Engage in the operation of a cemetery” means owning, controlling, or
managing a cemetery, including performing activities necessary for:
(1) the establishment, improvement, care, preservation, or embellishment
of a cemetery;
(2) interment; and
(3) the providing of burial space or burial goods.
[(k)] (M) (1) “Engage in the operation of a crematory” means controlling or
managing a crematory.
(2) “Engage in the operation of a crematory” does not include:
(i) the practice of funeral direction or the practice of mortuary
science; or
(ii) 1. assistance in making decisions and filling out forms that
are not directly related to cremation;

HOUSE BILL 892
2. obtaining vital statistics, signatures, and other
information necessary to complete a death certificate;
3. transportation of a body to the place of disposition; or
4. any other services regarding the disposition of a body that
are not directly related to cremation.
[(l)] (N) (1) “Engage in the operation of a reduction facility” means
controlling or managing a reduction facility.
(2) “Engage in the operation of a reduction facility” does not include:
(i) the practice of funeral direction or the practice of mortuary
science; or
(ii) 1. assistance in making decisions and filling out forms that
are not directly related to natural organic reduction;
2. obtaining vital statistics, signatures, and other
information necessary to complete a death certificate;
3. transportation of a body to the place of disposition; or
4. any other services regarding the disposition of a body that
are not directly related to natural organic reduction.
[(m)] (O) “Funeral establishment” means a building, structure, or premises from
which the business of funeral directing or embalming is conducted.
[(n)] (P) (1) “Human remains” means:
(i) the body of a deceased person; or
(ii) a part of a body or limb that has been removed from a living
person.
(2) “Human remains” includes the body or part of a body or limb in any
state of decomposition.
(3) “Human remains” does not include soil remains produced after the
completion of natural organic reduction.
[(o)] (Q) “Hydrolyzed remains” means the bone fragments produced by the
completion of alkaline hydrolysis.

HOUSE BILL 892 5
[(p)] (R) “Interment” means all final disposition of human remains or pet
remains, including:
(1) earth burial;
(2) mausoleum entombment; and
(3) niche or columbarium interment.
[(q)] (S) “Natural organic reduction” means the contained accelerated
conversion of human remains into soil.
[(r)] (T) “Office” means the Office of Cemetery Oversight.
[(s)] (U) “Permit” means a permit issued by the Director to allow a partnership,
limited liability company, or corporation to operate a business through which a registrant
may:
(1) engage in the operation of a cemetery or crematory; or
(2) provide burial goods.
[(t)] (V) (1) “Pet remains” means the body of a deceased animal that was kept
as a pet.
(2) “Pet remains” includes the body of a pet or a part of a pet’s body in any
state of decomposition or the body of a pet after having been cremated.
[(u)] (W) (1) “Preneed goods” means burial goods that are sold before the
buyer’s death.
(2) “Preneed goods” does not include burial space.
[(v)] (X) “Provide burial goods” means a retail transaction:
(1) to erect, service, or inscribe burial memorials; or
(2) to sell burial goods.
[(w)] (Y) “Reduction facility” means a building, portion of a building, or structure
that houses the necessary appliances, containers, and facilities for performing natural
organic reduction.
[(x)] (Z) “Registered cemeterian” means an individual registered to operate a
cemetery as a sole proprietor or on behalf of a sole proprietor or of a permit holder.

HOUSE BILL 892
[(y)] (AA) “Registered crematory operator” means an individual registered to
operate a crematory as a sole proprietor or on behalf of a sole proprietor or permit holder.
[(z)] (BB) “Registered reduction operator” means an individual registered to
operate a reduction facility as a sole proprietor or on behalf of a sole proprietor or a permit
holder.
[(aa)] (CC) “Registered seller” means an individual registered to provide burial
goods as a sole proprietor or on behalf of a sole proprietor or of a permit holder.
[(bb)] (DD) “Registration” means a registration issued by the Director authorizing
an individual to operate a cemetery, to operate a crematory, to operate a reduction facility,
or to provide burial goods.
[(cc)] (EE) “Responsible party” means a sole proprietor or the individual
designated by a partnership, limited liability company, or corporation to be responsible for
the operations of a cemetery, crematory, reduction facility, or burial goods business.
[(dd)] (FF) “Soil remains” means the soil produced at final disposition of a dead
human body at a reduction facility by completion of natural organic reduction.
5–505.
(a) IN THIS SECTION, “PERSON IN INTEREST” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
§ 14–121 OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO PROPERTY ACQUIRED BY THE
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION THAT IS NECESSARY FOR A PUBLIC PROJECT.
(C) (1) An action may be brought in accordance with the Maryland Rules [and
a court may pass a judgment for sale of a burial ground for another purpose if:
(1) the ground has been dedicated and used for burial;
(2) burial lots have been sold in the burial ground and deeds executed or
certificates issued to buyers of the lots;
(3) the ground has ceased to be used for burial; and
(4) it is desirable to dispose of the burial ground for another purpose]
WHEN THE OWNER OF PROPERTY THAT INCLUDES A CEMETERY PROPOSES THE
SALE, TRANSFER, OR ALTERNATE USE OF ALL OR PART OF THE CEMETERY THAT
DOES NOT CONFORM WITH THE OPERATION OF A CEMETERY.
(2) AN ACTION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE
BROUGHT BY:

HOUSE BILL 892 7
(I) A PERSON WITH A BURIAL RIGHT IN THE CEMETERY;
(II) A DESCENDANT COMMUNITY ORGANIZATION;
(III) A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT HAS A PURPOSE OF
PRESERVING THE CEMETERY;
(IV) A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT WITH A FINANCIAL, REGULATORY,
OR OTHER INTEREST IN THE PROPERTY; OR
(V) A PERSON IN INTEREST.
(3) THE OWNER OF THE PROPERTY THAT INCLUDES THE CEMETERY
HAS THE BURDEN OF PROOF IN ANY PROCEEDING REGARDING THE DISPOSITION OF
THE PROPERTY AND THE CEMETERY.
(C) (D) AFTER HEARING FROM ANY PERSON DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(2) (C)(2) OF THIS SECTION WHO WISHES TO BE HEARD ON THE
PROPOSED SALE, TRANSFER, OR ALTERNATE USE OF THE CEMETERY UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE COURT SHALL:
(1) ALLOW THE PROPOSED SALE, TRANSFER, OR ALTERNATE USE OF
ALL OR PART OF THE CEMETERY;
(2) PROHIBIT THE PROPOSED SALE, TRANSFER, OR ALTERNATE USE
OF ALL OR PART OF THE CEMETERY; OR
(3) ORDER AN ALTERNATIVE DISPOSITION OF THE CEMETERY.
[(b)] (D) (E) If the court is satisfied that it is [expedient] APPROPRIATE or would
be in the interest of [the parties] A PERSON DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B)(2) (C)(2)
OF THIS SECTION to sell the [burial ground] CEMETERY, the court SHALL:
(1) [may] pass a judgment for the sale of the [burial ground] CEMETERY
on the terms and notice the court sets;
(2) [shall] order that as much of the proceeds of the sale as necessary be
used to pay the expenses of removing any human remains in the [burial ground]
CEMETERY, buying burial lots in another [burial ground] CEMETERY, and reburying the
remains; and
(3) [shall] distribute the remaining proceeds of the sale among the parties
according to their interests.

HOUSE BILL 892
[(c)] (E) (F) A judgment [for] APPROVING the sale of a [burial ground passes to the
buyer of the burial ground] CEMETERY CONVEYS the title [to the burial ground] OF THE
CEMETERY free of the claims of:
(1) the owners of the [burial ground] CEMETERY; and
(2) the holders of burial [lots] RIGHTS IN THE CEMETERY.
(F) (G) IF THE COURT DETERMINES THAT THE SALE OR TRANSFER OF A
CEMETERY IS INAPPROPRIATE AND NOT IN THE BEST INTEREST OF A PERSON
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B)(2) (C)(2) OF THIS SECTION, THE COURT SHALL:
(1) (I) APPROVE THE TRANSFER TO A DESCENDANT COMMUNITY
ORGANIZATION OR OTHER NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT AGREES TO MAINTAIN
AND PRESERVE THE CEMETERY; AND
(II) APPROVE THE PRICE OF THE TRANSFER, INCLUDING A
DONATION OR NOMINAL FEE; OR
(2) ORDER A NEGOTIATION BETWEEN THE OWNER OF THE CEMETERY
AND THE PERSON THAT WISHES TO ACQUIRE IT.
(H) A COURT SHALL MAKE ALL DETERMINATIONS REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SECTION FOR THE DISPOSITION OF A PROPERTY THAT INCLUDES A CEMETERY NOT
MORE THAN 6 MONTHS AFTER THE ACTION IS FILED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION.
[5–506.
(a) An action may be brought in accordance with the Maryland Rules and a court
may pass a judgment for sale of a burial ground in Baltimore City for another purpose if:
(1) the ground has been dedicated and used for burial;
(2) burial lots have been sold in the burial ground and deeds executed or
other written instruments issued to buyers of the lots without provision being made for
perpetual care of the lots; and
(3) more than 75% of the area of the burial ground:
(i) has been abandoned; or
(ii) is harmful to the public health, safety, or welfare.

HOUSE BILL 892 9
(b) The action may be brought by:
(1) a person with a property right in the burial ground; or
(2) a governmental unit with an interest in ending the conditions that are
harmful to the public health, safety, or welfare.
(c) If the court is satisfied that more than 75% of the area of a burial ground has
been abandoned or is harmful to the public health, safety, or welfare, the court:
(1) may pass a judgment for the sale of the entire burial ground on the
terms and notice the court sets; and
(2) may appoint a trustee to sell the burial ground.
(d) The trustee shall distribute the sale proceeds:
(1) first, to pay the expenses of removing any human remains, that, with
reasonable care, can be definitely located in the burial ground, buying burial lots in another
burial ground, and reburying the remains;
(2) second, to pay expenses of removing any markers that are in good
condition from the old lots and relocating the markers on new lots;
(3) third, to pay the expenses of ending conditions that are harmful to the
public health, safety, or welfare, unless the contract of sale of the burial ground provides
for abatement of those conditions within a reasonable period of time after the sale is
completed;
(4) fourth, to pay the costs of necessary legal proceedings, including court
costs, trustee’s commissions, and legal fees;
(5) fifth, to pay in full any taxes; and
(6) finally, to pay the balance of the proceeds to the person who,
immediately before the sale, had record title to the burial ground in its entirety according
to the land records of Baltimore City.
(e) A judgment for the sale of a burial ground or a deed or other conveyancing
instrument executed by a trustee under this section passes to the buyer of the burial ground
the title to the burial ground free of:
(1) the claims of the owners of the burial ground;
(2) the claims of the holders of burial lots; and

HOUSE BILL 892
(3) the intended or actual use or dedication of the land in the burial ground
for burial.]
Article – Real Property
14–121.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) “Cultural affiliation” means a relationship of shared group identity that
can be reasonably traced historically between a present–day group, tribe, band, or clan and
an identifiable earlier group.
(4) “Person in interest” means a person who:
(i) Is related by blood or marriage to the person interred in a burial
site;
(ii) Is a domestic partner, as defined in § 1–101 of the Health –
General Article, of a person interred in a burial site;
(iii) Has a cultural affiliation with the person interred in a burial site;
or
(iv) Has an interest in a burial site that the Office of the State’s
Attorney for the county where the burial site is located recognizes is in the public interest
after consultation with a local burial sites advisory board or, if such a board does not exist,
the Maryland Historical Trust.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.